Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Effect of Lease Contract.

Sec. 45.12.301.
Enforceability of lease contract.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a lease contract is effective and enforceable according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of the goods, and against creditors of the parties.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.302.
Title to and possession of goods.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each provision of this chapter applies whether the lessor or a third party has title to the goods, and whether the lessor, the lessee, or a third party has possession of the goods, notwithstanding a statute or rule of law that possession or the absence of possession is fraudulent.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.303.
Alienability of party’s interest under lease contract or of lessor’s residual interest in goods; delegation of performance; transfer of rights.

Except as provided in (d) of this section and AS

45.29.407

, a provision in a lease agreement that does either of the following gives rise to the rights and remedies provided in (e) of this section, but a transfer that is prohibited or is an event of default under the lease agreement is otherwise effective:

prohibits the voluntary or involuntary transfer, including a transfer by sale, sublease, creation or enforcement of a security interest, or attachment, levy, or other judicial process, of

an interest of a party under the lease contract; or

the lessor’s residual interest in the goods; or

makes a transfer under (1) of this subsection an event of default.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 113 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 31 ch 113 SLA 2000.]

A provision in a lease agreement that does either of the following is not enforceable, and the transfer is not a transfer that materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance by, materially changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on, the other party to the lease contract within the purview of (e) of this section:

prohibits a transfer of a right to damages for default with respect to the whole lease contract or of a right to payment arising out of the transferor’s due performance of the transferor’s entire obligation; or

makes a transfer under (1) of this subsection an event of default.

Subject to (d) of this section and AS

45.29.407

,

if a transfer is made that is made an event of default under a lease agreement, the party to the lease contract not making the transfer, unless that party waives the default or otherwise agrees, has the rights and remedies under AS

45.12.501(b)

;

if (1) of this subsection is not applicable and if a transfer is made that is prohibited under a lease agreement or that materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance by, materially changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on, the other party to the lease contract, unless the party not making the transfer agrees at any time to the transfer in the lease contract or otherwise, then, except as limited by contract, the transferor is liable to the party not making the transfer for damages caused by the transfer to the extent that the damages could not reasonably be prevented by the party not making the transfer, and a court having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief, including cancellation of the lease contract or an injunction against the transfer.

A transfer of “the lease” or of “all my rights under the lease,” or a transfer in similar general terms, is a transfer of rights, and, unless the language or the circumstances, as in a transfer for security, indicate the contrary, the transfer is a delegation of duties by the transferor to the transferee. Acceptance by the transferee constitutes a promise by the transferee to perform those duties. The promise is enforceable by either the transferor or the other party to the lease contract.

Unless otherwise agreed by the lessor and the lessee, a delegation of performance does not relieve the transferor as against the other party of any duty to perform or any liability for default.

In a consumer lease, to prohibit the transfer of an interest of a party under the lease contract or to make a transfer an event of default, the language must be specific, by a writing, and conspicuous.

In this section, “creation of a security interest” includes the sale of a lease contract that is subject to AS 45.29, on secured transactions, by reason of AS

45.29.109(a)(3)

.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am §§ 25 — 27, 31 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.12.304.
Subsequent lease of goods by lessor.

Subject to AS

45.12.303

, a subsequent lessee from a lessor of goods under an existing lease contract obtains, to the extent of the leasehold interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that the lessor had or had power to transfer, and except as provided in (b) of this section and AS

45.12.527(d)

, takes subject to the existing lease contract. A lessor with voidable title has power to transfer a good leasehold interest to a good faith subsequent lessee for value, but only to the extent set out in the preceding sentence. If goods have been delivered under a transaction of purchase, the lessor has that power even though

the lessor’s transferor was deceived as to the identity of the lessor;

the delivery was in exchange for a check that is later dishonored;

it was agreed that the transaction was to be a “cash sale”; or

the delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under criminal law.

A subsequent lessee in ordinary course of business from a lessor who is a merchant dealing in goods of that kind to whom the goods were entrusted by the existing lessee of that lessor before the interest of the subsequent lessee became enforceable against that lessor obtains, to the extent of the leasehold interest transferred, all of that lessor’s and the existing lessee’s rights to the goods, and takes free of the existing lease contract.

A subsequent lessee from the lessor of goods that are subject to an existing lease contract and are covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction does not take greater rights than those provided both by this section and by the certificate of title statute. If the certificate of title statute is silent on the issue of transfer, this section controls.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 83 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “the” preceding “ordinary course of business”.

Sec. 45.12.305.
Sale or sublease of goods by lessee.

Subject to the provisions of AS

45.12.303

, a buyer or sublessee from the lessee of goods under an existing lease contract obtains, to the extent of the interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that the lessee had or had power to transfer, and except as provided in (b) of this section and AS

45.12.511(d)

, takes subject to the existing lease contract. A lessee with a voidable leasehold interest has power to transfer a good leasehold interest to a good faith buyer for value or a good faith sublessee for value, but only to the extent set out in the preceding sentence. If goods have been delivered under a transaction of lease, the lessee has that power even though

the lessor was deceived as to the identity of the lessee;

the delivery was in exchange for a check that is later dishonored; or

the delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under criminal law.

A buyer in ordinary course of business or a sublessee in ordinary course of business from a lessee who is a merchant dealing in goods of that kind to whom the goods were entrusted by the lessor obtains, to the extent of the interest transferred, all of the lessor’s and lessee’s rights to the goods, and takes free of the existing lease contract.

A buyer or sublessee from the lessee of goods that are subject to an existing lease contract and are covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction does not take greater rights than those provided both by this section and by the certificate of title statute.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 84 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “the” preceding “ordinary course of business” twice.

Sec. 45.12.306.
Priority of certain liens arising by operation of law.

If a person in the ordinary course of the person’s business furnishes services or materials with respect to goods subject to a lease contract, a lien upon those goods in the possession of that person given by statute or rule of law for those materials or services takes priority over any interest of the lessor or lessee under the lease contract or this chapter unless the lien is created by statute and the statute provides otherwise or unless the lien is created by rule of law and the rule of law provides otherwise.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.307.
Priority of liens arising by attachment or levy on, security interests in, and other claims to goods.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.12.306

, a creditor of a lessee takes subject to the lease contract.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section and in AS

45.12.306

and

45.12.308

, a creditor of a lessor takes subject to the lease contract unless the creditor holds a lien that attached to the goods before the lease contract became enforceable.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.317

,

45.29.321

, and

45.29.323

, a lessee takes a leasehold interest subject to a security interest held by a creditor of the lessor.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 113 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am §§ 28, 29, 31 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of future advances clauses under UCC Article 9, 90 ALR4th 859.

Equitable estoppel of secured party’s right to assert prior perfected security interest against other creditor or subsequent purchaser under Article 9 of UCC, 9 ALR5th 708.

Sec. 45.12.308.
Special rights of creditors.

A creditor of a lessor in possession of goods subject to a lease contract may treat the lease contract as void if as against the creditor retention of possession by the lessor is fraudulent, but retention of possession in good faith and current course of trade by the lessor for a commercially reasonable time after the lease contract becomes enforceable is not fraudulent.

Nothing in this chapter impairs the rights of creditors of a lessor if the lease contract

becomes enforceable, not in current course of trade but in satisfaction of or as security for a preexisting claim for money, security, or the like; and

is made under circumstances that under law apart from this chapter would constitute the transaction a fraudulent transfer or voidable preference.

A creditor of a seller may treat a sale or an identification of goods to a contract for sale as void if as against the creditor retention of possession by the seller is fraudulent but retention of possession of the goods under a lease contract entered into by the seller as lessee and the buyer as lessor in connection with the sale or identification of the goods is not fraudulent if the buyer bought for value and in good faith.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.309.
Lessor’s and lessee’s rights when goods become fixtures.

Under this chapter a lease may be of goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures, but a lease does not exist under this chapter of ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

This chapter does not prevent creation of a lease of fixtures under real estate law.

The perfected interest of a lessor of fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate if

the lease is a purchase money lease, the conflicting interest of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures, the interest of the lessor is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become fixtures or within 10 days after becoming fixtures, and the lessee has an interest of record in the real estate or is in possession of the real estate; or

the interest of the lessor is perfected by a fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record, the lessor’s interest has priority over a conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or owner, and the lessee has an interest of record in the real estate or is in possession of the real estate.

The interest of a lessor of fixtures, whether or not perfected, has priority over the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate if

the fixtures are readily removable factory or office machines, readily removable equipment that is not primarily used or leased for use in the operation of the real estate, or readily removable replacements of domestic appliances that are goods subject to a consumer lease, and before the goods become fixtures the lease contract is enforceable;

the conflicting interest is a lien on the real estate obtained by legal or equitable proceedings after the lease contract is enforceable;

the encumbrancer or owner has consented in writing to the lease or has disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures; or

the lessee has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner; if the lessee’s right to remove terminates, the priority of the interest of the lessor continues for a reasonable time.

Notwithstanding (c)(1) of this section but otherwise subject to (c) and (d) of this section, the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, is subordinate to the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real estate under a construction mortgage recorded before the goods become fixtures if the goods become fixtures before the completion of the construction. To the extent given to refinance a construction mortgage, the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real estate under a mortgage has this priority to the same extent as the encumbrancer of the real estate under the construction mortgage.

In cases not within (a) — (e) of this section, priority between the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, and the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate who is not the lessee is determined by the priority rules governing conflicting interests in real estate.

Subject to (h) of this section, if the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, has priority over all conflicting interests of all owners and encumbrances of the real estate, the lessor or the lessee may remove the goods from the real estate, free and clear of all conflicting interests of all owners and encumbrancers of the real estate, but the lessor or the lessee must reimburse an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate who is not the lessee and who has not otherwise agreed, for the cost of repair of physical injury, but not for a diminution in value of the real estate caused by the absence of the goods removed or by a necessity of replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the performance of this obligation.

The lessor or the lessee may remove the goods under (g) of this section

on default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease agreement but subject to the lease agreement and this chapter; or

if necessary to enforce other rights and remedies of the lessor or the lessee under this chapter.

Even though the lease agreement does not create a security interest, the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor’s residual interest, is perfected by recording a financing statement as a fixture filing for leased goods that are or are to become fixtures under the relevant provisions of AS 45.29 on secured transactions.

In this section,

“encumbrance” includes real estate mortgages and other liens on real estate and all other rights in real estate that are not ownership interests;

a “fixture filing” is the recording, in the office where a mortgage on the real estate would be recorded, of a financing statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and conforming to the requirements of AS

45.29.502(a)

and (b);

“fixtures” means goods that become so related to particular real estate that an interest in them arises under real estate law;

a lease is a “purchase money lease” unless the lessee has possession or use of the goods or the right to possession or use of the goods before the lease agreement is enforceable; and

a mortgage is a “construction mortgage” to the extent that it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on land including the acquisition cost of the land if the recorded writing indicates.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 30 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Collateral references. —

Improper sale, removal, concealment, or disposal of property subject to security interest under UCC, 48 ALR4th 819.

Equitable estoppel of secured party’s right to assert prior perfected security interest against other creditor or subsequent purchaser under Article 9 of UCC, 9 ALR5th 708.

Sec. 45.12.310.
Lessor’s and lessee’s rights when goods become accessions.

“Accessions” means goods when they are installed in or affixed to other goods.

The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract entered into before the goods became accessions is superior to all interests in the whole except as stated in (d) of this section.

The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract entered into at the time or after the goods became accessions is superior to all subsequently acquired interests in the whole except as stated in (d) of this section but is subordinate to interests in the whole existing at the time the lease contract was made unless the holders of those interests in the whole have in writing consented to the lease or disclaimed an interest in the goods as part of the whole.

The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract described in (b) or (c) of this section is subordinate to the interest of

a buyer in ordinary course of business or a lessee in ordinary course of business of an interest in the whole acquired after the goods became accessions; or

a creditor with a security interest in the whole perfected before the lease contract was made to the extent that the creditor makes subsequent advances without knowledge of the lease contract.

When under (b) or (c), and (d) of this section, and subject to (f) of this section, a lessor or a lessee of accessions holds an interest that is superior to all interests in the whole, the lessor or the lessee may remove the goods from the whole, free and clear of all interests in the whole, but the lessor or lessee must reimburse a holder of an interest in the whole who is not the lessee and who has not otherwise agreed, for the cost of repair of physical injury but not for a diminution in value of the whole caused by the absence of the goods removed or by a necessity for replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the performance of this obligation.

The lessor or the lessee may remove the goods under (e) of this section

on default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease contract by the other party but subject to the provisions of the lease contract and this chapter; or

if necessary to enforce other rights and remedies of the lessor or lessee under this chapter.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 85 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (d)(1), deleted “the” preceding “ordinary course of business” twice, and substituted “an” for “any” preceding “interest in the whole”.

Collateral references. —

Improper sale, removal, concealment, or disposal of property subject to security interest under UCC, 48 ALR4th 819.

Sec. 45.12.311.
Priority subject to subordination.

Nothing in this chapter prevents subordination by agreement by a person entitled to priority.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)